Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-1110, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-1110. A. No person shall throw or deposit upon any
highway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans or any
other substances likely to injure any person, animal or vehicle upon
such highway.
B. Any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown,
upon any highway any destructive or injurious material shall
immediately remove the same or cause it to be removed.
1. C. Any person, wrecker, or towing operator removing a
wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway, highway right-of-way or
any other location as the result of an accident shall remove any
Req. No. 11558 Page 1

glas s or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway or
highway right-of-way or other location from such vehicle. The owner
or insurer of the owner of the vehicle if the owner's insurance
policy provides coverage for such expense, owner has the minimum
coverage amounts as required by Section 7-324 of this title, shall
be responsible for the cost of removal of the vehicle and the glass
or other injurious substance and any vehicle storage fees. The cost
of the removal of the vehicle and any storage fees shall be the same
as established by the Corporation Commission for nonconsensual tows.
D. Upon receipt of a claim by the insurer from a person,
wrecker, or towing operator for the removal of a wrecked or damaged
vehicle, glass, or other injurious substance from a highway, highway
right-of-way, or any other location, the insurer shall remit payment
for the removal claim payable to the company providing the removal.
The fees for removal and cleanup constitutes a special lien and is
payable before any other claims.
2. E. Truck-tractors carrying cargo on the roadways of this
state shall maintain a commercial auto, farm and ranch, inland
marine or cargo liability insurance policy that covers the costs of
cleanup of any substance that is spilled or otherwise deposited on
the roadway or right-of-way in violation of this section.
C. F. No person shall throw any substance at a standing vehicle
or any occupant thereof, nor shall any person throw any substance at
a person on or adjacent to a highway.
Req. No. 11558 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11558 MJ 12/13/24





















Req. No. 11558 Page 3